District of Columbia statutes.
21-324

Effect of repeal of Uniform Gifts to Minors Act.

To the extent that this chapter by virtue of section 21-322(b) does not apply to transfers made in a manner prescribed in the District of Columbia Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or to the powers, duties, and its immunities conferred by transfers in that manner upon custodians and persons dealing with custodians, the repeal of the District of Columbia Uniform Gifts to Minors Act does not affect those transfers or those powers, duties and immunities.

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278
1981 Ed., § 21-324.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 27 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.